Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-573
Litter; removal; notice; action by city or village.

Each city of the second class and village may, by ordinance, prohibit and control the throwing, depositing, or accumulation of litter on any lot or piece of ground within the city or village or within its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction and require the removal of such litter so as to abate any nuisance. If the owner fails to remove such litter, after five days' notice by publication and by certified mail, the city or village shall remove the litter or cause it to be removed and shall assess the cost of removal against the property so benefited as provided by ordinance.

Laws 1975, LB 117, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB266, § 9;

R.S.Supp.,2016, § 17-123.01;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 309.